src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!
LEXICON kv18 ! brúður
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:urin FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðurin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:rina FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðrina
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:rini FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðrini
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:ar   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:arinnar FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðarinnar
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:rarinnar FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðrarinnar
 +N+Fem:r       F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem:r       F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:r       F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv19 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** fjøður
  kv19e    ;
  kv_flt19 ;
!
LEXICON kv19e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^EPH^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt19f
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv_flt19f ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt19
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^EPH^OEA F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem:^EPH      F_PLDAT  ;
 +N+Fem:^EPH^OEA F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^EPH^OEA F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv20 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** ær (only)
 +N+Fem:ær S_F_SGNAD      ;
 +N+Fem:ær S_F_SGGEN_NULL ;
 +N+Fem:ær F_PLNA_NULL    ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:óm  ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ónum  ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ærnum ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem:á  F_PLGEN        ;
!
LEXICON kv21 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** gjógv
 kv21e    ;
 kv_flt21 ;
 !
LEXICON kv21e 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:ógvin    ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ónna     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ónni     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:áar      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:áarinnar ENDLEX ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt21
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:áir      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:áirnar   ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:áir      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:áirnar   ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:áum      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:áunum    ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:áa       ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:áanna    ENDLEX ;
!
LEXICON kv21_b
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ó      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:óin    ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ó      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ónna     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ó      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ónni     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:áar      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:áarinnar ENDLEX ;
 kv_flt21 ;
!
LEXICON kv22 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** klógv, rógv  stem: kl-, r-
  kv22e    ;
  kv_flt22 ;
!
LEXICON kv22e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:ógvin    ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ónna     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ónni     ENDLEX ;
              +N+Fem:ó        S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt22
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:øur     ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:ørnar   ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:øur     ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:ørnar   ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:óm      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ónum    ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ørnum   ENDLEX ; ! klørnum
              +N+Fem:ógv     F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv23 ! trúgv
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv23e    ;
  kv_flt23 ;
!
LEXICON kv23e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
       +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:            DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:            FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:^GVDEL%>nna FemObl_Flag ;
       +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:            R ; ! stem compound
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:            FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>nni FemObl_Flag ;
              +N+Fem:^GVDEL      S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt23
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv24/2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  :ú kv2  ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:únna FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:únni FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:ýr FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:ýrnar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:ýr FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:ýrnar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:úm FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:únum FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ýrnum FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv24/6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv24 ;
  :úgv kv6  ;
!  
!LEXICON kv24/6e
!  kv24 ;
!  kv6e  ;
!
!LEXICON kv24e/6e
!  kv24e ;
!  kv6e  ;
!
LEXICON kv24 ! kúgv
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv24e    ;
  kv_flt24 ;
!
LEXICON kv24e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:úgv DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:úgv      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:únna FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:úgv      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:únni FemObl_Flag ; ! oynni, consider i:n <=> 
 +N+Fem:úgv S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt24
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:ýr FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:ýrnar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:ýr FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:ýrnar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:úm FemObl_Flag   ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:únum FemObl_Flag   ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ýrnum FemObl_Flag   ;
 +N+Fem:úgv F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv25 ! gás
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:gás 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:gásin 	    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:gás 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:gásina     FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:gás 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:gásini     FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:gásar 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:gásarinnar FemObl_Flag ;
!
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:gæs 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:gæsnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:gæs 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:gæsnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:gásum 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:gásunum 	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:gæsnum 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:gása 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:gásanna 	FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv26 ! tá
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:tá 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:táin 	    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:tá 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:tánna      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:tá 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:tánni      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:táar 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:táarinnar  FemObl_Flag ;
!
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:tær 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:tærnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:tær 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:tærnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:tóm 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:tónum	 	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:tærnum 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:táa 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:táanna 	FemObl_Flag ;
!
!
LEXICON kv27 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** rás
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt28
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:dyr		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:dyrnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:dyr 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:dyrnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:durum 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:durunum	 	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:dyrnum 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:dura 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:duranna 	FemObl_Flag ;
!
LEXICON kv29 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** móðir
 +N+Fem+Sg:móð kv29e    ;
 +N+Fem+Pl:møð kv_flt29 ;
!
LEXICON kv29e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom:ir DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +Acc:ur DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +Acc+Def:rina FemObl_Flag ;
 +Dat:ur DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +Dat+Def:rini FemObl_Flag ;
 +Gen:ur DF_G_SGf_S ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt29
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom:ur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Acc:ur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Dat:ru DF_D_PL   ;
 +Gen:ra DF_G_PL   ;
!
LEXICON kv30 ! dóttir
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg:dótt kv30e    ;
 +N+Fem+Pl:døt  kv_flt30 ;
!
LEXICON kv30e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom:ir DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +Acc+Indef:ur FemObl_Flag ;
 +Acc+Def:rina FemObl_Flag ;
 +Dat:ur DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +Dat+Def:rini FemObl_Flag ;
 +Gen:ur DF_G_SGf_S ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt30
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv_flt29 ;
