src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns
tá+CmpNP/None: kv26 ;
frú+CmpNP/None:fr kv24/2 ;
gjó+CmpNP/None:gj kv21_b ;
rás+CmpNP/None:rás kv27 ;
LEXICON Nouns
vargær:varg# kv20 ;
fjallær:fjall# kv20 ;
sløðingarær:sløðingar# kv20 ;
matær:mat# kv20 ;
dóttir: kv30 ;
abbadóttir:abba# kv30 ;
miðlingadóttir:miðlinga# kv30 ;
leysingadóttir:leysinga# kv30 ;
onkadóttir:onka# kv30 ;
sonardóttir:sonar# kv30 ;
fosturdóttir:fostur# kv30 ;
dótturdóttir:dóttur# kv30 ;
bróðurdóttir:bróður# kv30 ;
gjó+CmpNP/None:gj kv21_b ;
láturgjógv:láturgj kv21 ;
loftgjógv:loftgj kv21 ;
trælalógv:trælal kv21 ;
fiskaflógv:fiskafl kv21 ;
útflógv:útfl kv21 ;
vetrarlógv:vetrarl kv21 ;
krógv+CmpNP/None:kr kv21 ;
maðkakrógv:maðkakr kv21 ;
ervakrógv:ervakr kv21 ;
deyðseyðakrógv:deyðseyðakr kv21 ;
torvkrógv:torvkr kv21 ;
frú+CmpNP/None:fr kv24/2 ;
ungfrú:ung#fr kv24/2 ;
dandisfrú:dandis#fr kv24/2 ;
lofnaklógv:lofnakl kv22 ;
mosaklógv:mosakl kv22 ;
lyngklógv:lyngkl kv22 ;
bitiklógv:bitikl kv22 ;
framklógv:framkl kv22 ;
arnarklógv:arnarkl kv22 ;
afturklógv:afturkl kv22 ;
nábalsklógv:nábalskl kv22 ;
rógv:r kv22 ;
tógv:t kv22 ;
krákudóttir:kráku# kv30 ;
hagaær:haga# kv20 ;
avdeyðaær:avdeyða# kv20 ;
inniær:inni# kv20 ;
eggjarær:eggjar# kv20 ;
pundsær:punds# kv20 ;
klepsær:kleps# kv20 ;
hjáær:hjá# kv20 ;
helsingagás:helsinga# kv25 ;
geldgás:geld# kv25 ;
korngás:korn# kv25 ;
havgás:hav# kv25 ;
kattarklógv:kattarkl kv22 ;
huldukúgv:hulduk kv24 ;
gravkúgv:gravk kv24 ;
heingibrúgv:heingibr kv24/6 ;
viðarbrúgv:viðarbr kv24/6 ;
havfrúgv:havfr kv24/6 ;
hjartarfrúgv:hjartarfr kv24/6 ;
kristnitrúgv:kristnitrúgv kv23 ;
illtrúgv:illtrúgv kv23 ;
greivafrú:greiva#fr kv24/2 ;
greivafrúgv:greiva#fr kv24/6 ;
jomfrú:jom#fr kv24/2 ;
húsfrú:hús#fr kv24/2 ;
havfrú:hav#fr kv24/2 ;
respekt:respekt kv23 ;
trúgv:trúgv kv23 ;
andatrúgv:andatrúgv kv23 ;
fleirgudatrúgv:fleirgudatrúgv kv23 ;
villutrúgv:villutrúgv kv23 ;
avdeyðakúgv:avdeyðak kv24 ;
reisikúgv:reisik kv24 ;
rakkúgv:rakk kv24 ;
summarkúgv:summark kv24 ;
várkúgv:várk kv24 ;
ekrukúgv:ekruk kv24 ;
sjókúgv:sjók kv24 ;
tarabrúgv:tarabr kv24 ;
letisúgv:letis kv24 ;
oddagás:odda# kv25 ;
brandgás:brand# kv25 ;
floggás:flog# kv25 ;
bramgás:bram# kv25 ;
svalbarðsgás:svalbarðs# kv25 ;
tápugás:tápu# kv25 ;
røtugás:røtu# kv25 ;
stokkabrúgv:stokkabr kv24/6 ;
vongbrúgv:vongbr kv24/6 ;
ísbrúgv:ísbr kv24/6 ;
flotbrúgv:flotbr kv24/6 ;
træbrúgv:træbr kv24/6 ;
aðalsfrúgv:aðalsfr kv24/6 ;
tá: kv26 ;
lítlatá:lítla# kv26 ;
stóratá:stóra# kv26 ;
aftastatá:aftasta# kv26 ;
fremstatá:fremsta# kv26 ;
baktá:bak# kv26 ;
framtá:fram# kv26 ;
æður+CmpNP/None:æð kv18 ;
lusiabrúður:lusia#brúð kv18 ;
glopradyr:glopra# kv_flt28 ;
handilsdyr:handils# kv_flt28 ;
hjalsdyr:hjals# kv_flt28 ;
inndyr:inn# kv_flt28 ;
kirkjudyr:kirkju# kv_flt28 ;
krambúðardyr:kram#búðar# kv_flt28 ;
neystadyr:neysta# kv_flt28 ;
útidyr:úti# kv_flt28 ;
portursdyr:porturs# kv_flt28 ;
frádyr:frá# kv_flt28 ;
vangafjaðrar:vangafjaður kv_flt19 ;
lundafjøður:lundafjøður kv19 ;
nakkafjøður:nakkafjøður kv19 ;
velafjøður:velafjøður kv19 ;
strussafjøður:strussafjøður kv19 ;
vongfjøður:vongfjøður kv19 ;
stýrifjøður:stýrifjøður kv19 ;
rekfjøður:rekfjøður kv19 ;
velfjøður:velfjøður kv19 ;
stinnfjøður:stinnfjøður kv19 ;
veingjarfjøður:veingjarfjøður kv19 ;
dunnufjøður:dunnufjøður kv19 ;
barnamóðir:barna# kv29 ;
stjúkmóðir:stjúk# kv29 ;
soppmóðir:sopp# kv29 ;
ættarmóðir:ættar# kv29 ;
burðarmóðir:burðar# kv29 ;
formóðir:for# kv29 ;
ravnsmóðir:ravns# kv29 ;
ljósmóðir:ljós# kv29 ;
ættmóðir:ætt# kv29 ;
húsmóðir:hús# kv29 ;
leðurrógv:leðurr kv22e ;
fólkatrúgv:fólkatrúgv kv23e ;
turkatrúgv:turkatrúgv kv23e ;
trøllatrúgv:trøllatrúgv kv23e ;
barnatrúgv:barnatrúgv kv23e ;
ásatrúgv:ásatrúgv kv23e ;
bókstavatrúgv:bókstavatrúgv kv23e ;
vantrúgv:vantrúgv kv23e ;
mistrúgv:mistrúgv kv23e ;
rætttrúgv:rætttrúgv kv23e ;
pátrúgv:pátrúgv kv23e ;
uppátrúgv:uppátrúgv kv23e ;
dagsbrúgv:dagsbr kv24e ;
feginsbrúgv:feginsbr kv24e ;
ófeginsbrúgv:ófeginsbr kv24e ;
rútarfrúgv:rútarfr kv24e ;
spaðarfrúgv:spaðarfr kv24e ;
súgv:s kv24e ;
fjáltur:fjáltur kv19e ;
perlumóðir:perlu# kv29 ;
skølingsbrýr:skølings#br kv_flt24 ;
sigur:sig kv18 ;
